test/src/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-Jun_2017_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol: Morph
  xerox:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst: Morph
      lookup: App

Tests:

# generated in Jun 2017 while converting Filosoft lexicon to 2-level formalism
# these words were part of the test cases, checked manually

  Pronouns:
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ill: nendessesamadesse
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nendessesamadessegi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ela: nendestsamadest
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nendestsamadestki
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ine: nendessamades
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nendessamadeski
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Tra: nendekssamadeks
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nendekssamadekski
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Abl: nendeltsamadelt
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nendeltsamadeltki
    seesama+Pron+Pl+All: nendelesamadele
    seesama+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nendelesamadelegi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ade: nendelsamadel
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nendelsamadelgi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendesamadena
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendesamadenagi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendesamadeni
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendesamadenigi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendesamadeta
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendesamadetagi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Com: nendesamadega
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendesamadegagi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Gen: nendesamade
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nendesamadegi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neidsamasidki
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: neidsamasid
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Par: neidsamu
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: neidsamugi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Nom: needsamad
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: needsamadki
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neissesamadessegi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: neissesamadesse
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neistsamadestki
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: neistsamadest
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neissamadeski
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: neissamades
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neikssamadekski
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: neikssamadeks
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neiltsamadeltki
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: neiltsamadelt
    seesama+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neilesamadelegi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: neilesamadele
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neilsamadelgi
    seesama+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: neilsamadel
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sessamaski
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare: sessamas
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sessesamassegi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: sessesamasse
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sestsamastki
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/Rare: sestsamast
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sekssamakski
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/Rare: sekssamaks
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: seltsamaltki
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/Rare: seltsamalt
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: selsamalgi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: selsamal
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Par: sedasama
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sedasamagi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Nom: seesama
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: seesamagi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ill: sellessesamasse
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sellessesamassegi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ela: sellestsamast
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sellestsamastki
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ine: sellessamas
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: sellessamaski
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Tra: sellekssamaks
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sellekssamakski
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Abl: selleltsamalt
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: selleltsamaltki
    seesama+Pron+Sg+All: sellelesamale
    seesama+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sellelesamalegi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ade: sellelsamal
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sellelsamalgi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellesamana
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sellesamanagi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Trm: sellesamani
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sellesamanigi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Abe: sellesamata
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: sellesamatagi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Com: sellesamaga
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: sellesamagagi
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Gen: sellesama
    seesama+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: sellesamagi
